Hawaii, session 2025, SB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that electric vehicle popularity and usage in the State has grown dramatically.  Electric vehicle registration has increased by thirty per cent, resulting in over thirty-four thousand registered vehicles in the State. As electric vehicle usage increases, more electric vehicle batteries will enter the waste stream.  Proper recycling and disposal practices are needed to ensure that electric vehicle batteries do not contribute to environmental harm. The purpose of this Act is to establish a working group to examine how to maximize the recycling and reuse of electric vehicle batteries and recommend electric vehicle battery management practices. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the Hawaii state energy office an electric vehicle battery recycling and reuse working group to examine how to maximize the recycling and reuse of electric vehicle battery management practices. (b) The working group shall: (1)  Develop a plan for best management practices for the recycling, reuse, or repurposing of electric vehicle batteries; (2)  Coordinate with any other organization, working group, or relevant entity within or outside of the State that has similar objectives as the working group, or is researching the recycling, reuse, or repurposing of electric vehicle batteries; and (3)  Develop policy recommendations for the legislature to implement based on the working group's findings. (c) The working group shall consist of: (1)  The chief energy officer, or the chief energy officer's designee, who shall serve as the co-chairperson of the working group; (2)  The director of health, or the director's designee, who shall serve as the co-chairperson of the working group; and (3)  One representative from the department of environmental services of the city and county of Honolulu. (d) The co-chairpersons of the working group shall invite the following individuals to serve as members of the working group: (1)  Two representatives from the electric vehicle manufacturing industry; (2)  One representative from the automotive repair industry; (3)  One representative from the energy storage industry; (4)  One representative from the electronic waste recycling industry; (5)  One representative from an electric utility; (6)  One representative from an organization that specializes in extended producer responsibility policy; (7)  One representative from an environmental organization that specializes in waste reduction and recycling; (8)  One representative from the automotive recycling industry; (9)  One representative from the battery storage industry; and (10)  Other individuals as invited by the co-chairpersons. (e) The working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.  The report shall include an analysis of: (1)  Opportunities for and barriers to the reuse of electric vehicle batteries as a first option, as potential energy storage systems as a second option, and for recycling as a third option, taking into account the additional costs of transporting electric vehicle batteries to be recycled out-of-state; (2)  Best practices for the management of electric vehicle batteries at end-of-life; (3)  The cost, safety, and environmental impacts of in-state versus out-of-state recycling options; (4)  The feasibility of pursuing any recycling options outside of the United States; (5)  The feasibility in terms of costs, available infrastructure, and enforcement of an electric vehicle battery recycling program; and (6)  The overall effect of different management practices on the environment. (f) The working group shall be dissolved on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.